Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,110
Holders of contingent interests; rights; joinder in action.

Persons having contingent interests in such property may be made parties to the proceedings, and the proceeds of the property so situated (or the property itself, in case of partition) shall be subject to the order of the court until the right becomes fully vested.

R.S.1867, Code § 843, p. 542;

R.S.1913, § 8326;

C.S.1922, § 9278;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,110;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,110.